Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2532.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Performance audit; report; delayed repeal A. The auditor general shall conduct a special audit as defined in section 41-1278, Arizona Revised Statutes, of the amount of monies spent on programs and services for individuals experiencing homelessness in this state, including all of the following: 1. Expenditures by this state. 2. Expenditures by municipalities and counties with homeless populations higher than the per capita average of this state. 3. Expenditures of federal monies allocated to this state for homeless programs. 4. Expenditures by state and local law enforcement agencies to address homelessness, including transportation to emergency shelters, responding to crisis calls, providing overnight shelter in jail and enforcing camping bans. B. All state and local governmental entities of this state shall cooperate with the special audit and grant access, at no cost, to all financial records and any other information necessary to complete the special audit. C. The special audit shall examine all of the following: 1. The awarding of any contracts and grants relating to homeless services and support. 2. Any metrics used to examine the success of any expenditures. 3. The efficiency of the use of data management systems in relation to the programs. 4. The expenditure for each individual experiencing homelessness for each service provided. D. On or before December 31, 2027, the auditor general shall submit copies of the special audit report to the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives and provide a copy of this report to the secretary of state. E. This section is repealed from and after June 30, 2028. Sec. 2. Appropriation; auditor general; exemption A. The sum of $1,250,000 is appropriated from the housing trust fund established by section 41-3955, Arizona Revised Statutes, in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the auditor general for the purposes provided in this act. B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.